Washington statutes.
RCW 43.102.030

Powers and duties.

In addition to other responsibilities set forth in this chapter, the office shall:

(1) Conduct fair, thorough, transparent, and competent investigations of police use of force and other incidents involving law enforcement as authorized in this chapter and shall prioritize investigations conducted by the office based on resources and other criteria developed in consultation with the advisory board. The office shall commence investigations as follows:

(a) Beginning no later than July 1, 2022, the office is authorized to conduct investigations of deadly force cases occurring after July 1, 2022, including any incident involving use of deadly force by an involved officer against or upon a person who is in-custody or out-of-custody; and

(b) Beginning no later than July 1, 2023, the office is authorized to review, and may investigate, prior investigations of deadly force by an involved officer if new evidence is brought forth that was not included in the initial investigation;

(2) Analyze data available to the office and provide reports and recommendations as appropriate based on the data regarding issues, trends, and other relevant areas;

(3) Provide reports on activities of the office as authorized under this chapter; and

(4) Carry out such other responsibilities as may be consistent with this chapter.

[ 2021 c 318 s 302.]

NOTES:

Finding—Intent—2021 c 318: See note following RCW 43.102.020.